Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.120

Sick leave account created—Payments to state employees on account of sickness—Exclusion from wages.

There is created in the general fund a separate account to be known as the sick leave account, to be used for payments made after January 1, 1980, to state employees made on account of sickness, for the purpose of excluding such payments from the meaning of "wages" under federal old age and survivors' insurance. The legislature shall appropriate amounts necessary for the account.

[ 1979 c 152 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 152: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 152 s 8.]